Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5564.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 28A.150.210 and 2011 c 280 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:A basic education is ((an evolving))a program of instruction that is intended to provide students with the opportunity to ((become responsible and respectful global citizens, to))gain knowledge and skills to become globally competitive citizens. A basic education should contribute to their economic well-being and that of their families and communities, ((to explore and understand different perspectives,)) and enhance their opportunity to enjoy productive and satisfying lives. Additionally, the state of Washington intends to provide for a public school system that ((is able to evolve and adapt in order to better focus on strengthening))will strengthen the educational achievement of all students, which includes high expectations for all students and gives all students the opportunity to achieve personal and academic success. To these ends, the goals of each school district, with the involvement of parents and community members, shall be to provide opportunities for every student to develop the knowledge and skills essential to:(1) Read with comprehension, write effectively, and communicate successfully in a variety of ways and settings and with a variety of audiences;(2) Know and apply the core concepts and principles of mathematics; social, physical, and life sciences; civics and history, ((including different cultures and participation in representative government))emphasizing the foundations of our constitutional republic form of government in this sovereign state and country; geography; arts; and health and fitness. The core concepts and principles must focus on academic accuracy and a sound understanding of mathematical and scientific facts;(3) Think analytically, independently, logically, and creatively, and to integrate technology literacy and fluency as well as different experiences and knowledge to form reasoned judgments and solve problems; and(4) Understand the importance of work and finance and how performance, effort, and decisions directly affect future career and educational opportunities.Sec. 2. RCW 28A.300.112 and 2020 c 59 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) ((By September 1, 2021, the))The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall identify and make available ethnic studies materials and resources for use in grades kindergarten through ((twelve))12. The materials and resources must be designed to prepare students to ((be global citizens in a global society with an appreciation for the contributions of multiple))appreciate and admire differing cultures. The materials and resources must be posted on the office of the superintendent of public instruction's website.(2)(a) Public schools with students in grades seven through ((twelve))12 are encouraged to offer an ethnic studies course that incorporates the materials and resources identified under subsection (1) of this section.(b) Public schools with students in grades kindergarten through six are encouraged to incorporate the materials and resources identified under subsection (1) of this section.Sec. 3. RCW 28A.655.300 and 2020 c 59 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:((By September 1, 2021, the))The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall identify existing state learning standards that address the knowledge and skills that all public school students need to ((be global citizens in a global society with an appreciation for the contributions of diverse))appreciate and admire differing cultures. These state learning standards must be periodically updated to incorporate best practices in ethnic studies.--- END ---